test/src/gt-norm-yamls/N-poechoei_gt-norm.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.hfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.hfst
  xerox:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.xfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.xfst
    App: lookup

Tests:

# todo:
# Proofread the gold standard (below)
# Then: run analyser, then correct. 


  Noun - pöčöi: # Noun 'paunch, tripe / pötsi' - full paradigm
     pöčöi+N+Sg+Nom: pöčöi
     pöčöi+N+Sg+Gen: pöčöin
     pöčöi+N+Sg+Acc: [pöčöi, pöčöin]
     pöčöi+N+Sg+Par: pöččöidy
     pöčöi+N+Sg+Tra: pöčöikse
     pöčöi+N+Sg+Abe: [pöčöittäh, pöčöitä]
     pöčöi+N+Sg+Com: pöčöinke
     pöčöi+N+Sg+Ine: pöčöis
     pöčöi+N+Sg+Ela: [pöčöispäi, pöčöis]
     pöčöi+N+Sg+Ill: pöččöih
     pöčöi+N+Sg+Ade: pöčöil
     pöčöi+N+Sg+Abl: [pöčöilpäi, pöčöil]
     pöčöi+N+Sg+All: pöčöile
     pöčöi+N+Sg+Ess: pöčöinny
     pöčöi+N+Sg+Ter: pöččöissäh
     pöčöi+N+Sg+Apr: pöčöillyö
     pöčöi+N+Pl+Nom: pöčöit
     pöčöi+N+Pl+Gen: pöččölöin
     pöčöi+N+Pl+Acc: pöčöit
     pöčöi+N+Pl+Par: pöččölöi
     pöčöi+N+Pl+Tra: pöččölöikse
     pöčöi+N+Pl+Abe: [pöččölöittäh, pöččölöitä]
     pöčöi+N+Pl+Com: pöččölöinke
     pöčöi+N+Pl+Ine: pöččölöis
     pöčöi+N+Pl+Ela: [pöččölöispäi, pöččölöis]
     pöčöi+N+Pl+Ill: pöččölöih
     pöčöi+N+Pl+Ade: pöččölöil
     pöčöi+N+Pl+Abl: [pöččölöilpäi, pöččölöil]
     pöčöi+N+Pl+All: pöččölöile
     pöčöi+N+Pl+Ess: pöččölöinny
     pöčöi+N+Pl+Ins: pöččölöin
     pöčöi+N+Pl+Apr: pöččölöillyö
     pöčöi+N+Sg+Nom+Clt/gi: pöčöigi
     pöčöi+N+Sg+Gen+Clt/gi: pöčöingi
     pöčöi+N+Sg+Acc+Clt/gi: [pöčöigi, pöčöingi]
     pöčöi+N+Sg+Par+Clt/gi: pöččöidygi
     pöčöi+N+Sg+Tra+Clt/gi: pöčöiksegi
     pöčöi+N+Sg+Abe+Clt/gi: [pöčöittähgi, pöčöitägi]
     pöčöi+N+Sg+Com+Clt/gi: pöčöinkegi
     pöčöi+N+Sg+Ine+Clt/gi: pöčöisgi
     pöčöi+N+Sg+Ela+Clt/gi: [pöčöispäigi, pöčöisgi]
     pöčöi+N+Sg+Ill+Clt/gi: pöččöihgi
     pöčöi+N+Sg+Ade+Clt/gi: pöčöilgi
     pöčöi+N+Sg+Abl+Clt/gi: [pöčöilpäigi, pöčöilgi]
     pöčöi+N+Sg+All+Clt/gi: pöčöilegi
     pöčöi+N+Sg+Ess+Clt/gi: pöčöinnygi
     pöčöi+N+Sg+Ter+Clt/gi: pöččöissähgi
     pöčöi+N+Sg+Apr+Clt/gi: pöčöillyögi
     pöčöi+N+Pl+Nom+Clt/gi: pöčöitgi
     pöčöi+N+Pl+Gen+Clt/gi: pöččölöingi
     pöčöi+N+Pl+Acc+Clt/gi: pöčöitgi
     pöčöi+N+Pl+Par+Clt/gi: pöččölöigi
     pöčöi+N+Pl+Tra+Clt/gi: pöččölöiksegi
     pöčöi+N+Pl+Abe+Clt/gi: [pöččölöittähgi, pöččölöitägi]
     pöčöi+N+Pl+Com+Clt/gi: pöččölöinkegi
     pöčöi+N+Pl+Ine+Clt/gi: pöččölöisgi
     pöčöi+N+Pl+Ela+Clt/gi: [pöččölöispäigi, pöččölöisgi]
     pöčöi+N+Pl+Ill+Clt/gi: pöččölöihgi
     pöčöi+N+Pl+Ade+Clt/gi: pöččölöilgi
     pöčöi+N+Pl+Abl+Clt/gi: [pöččölöilpäigi, pöččölöilgi]
     pöčöi+N+Pl+All+Clt/gi: pöččölöilegi
     pöčöi+N+Pl+Ess+Clt/gi: pöččölöinnygi
     pöčöi+N+Pl+Ter+Clt/gi: pöččölöissähgi
     pöčöi+N+Pl+Ins+Clt/gi: pöččölöingi
     pöčöi+N+Pl+Apr+Clt/gi: pöččölöillyögi
